Wisconsin, session 2025, SB815.
do enact as follows:SB815,11Section 1. 942.085 of the statutes is created to read:SB815,2,22942.085 Synthetic digital representation. (1) In this section:SB815,2,53(a) “Recognizable personal characteristic” means an individual’s face, 4likeness, voice, or other identifiable, unique characteristic that, alone, is sufficient 5to clearly identify the individual.SB815,2,66(b) “Representation” has the meaning given in s. 942.09 (1) (c).SB815,2,97(c) “Synthetic digital representation” means a representation to which all of 8the following apply, regardless of whether the representation includes components 9that are artificial, legally generated, or generally accessible:SB815,2,11101. The representation is generated, altered, or otherwise manipulated using 11technological means.SB815,2,13122. The representation uses an individual’s recognizable personal 13characteristic.SB815,2,15143. The representation would appear to a reasonable observer to be an 15authentic representation of an individual’s speech, conduct, or likeness.SB815,2,17164. The representation was generated, altered, or otherwise manipulated 17without the consent of the individual depicted in the representation.SB815,3,318(2) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), whoever creates and posts, publishes, 1distributes, or exhibits a synthetic digital representation of an individual with 2intent to coerce, harass, or intimidate any individual is guilty of a Class A 3misdemeanor.SB815,3,64(b) Whoever creates and posts, publishes, distributes, or exhibits a synthetic 5digital representation of an individual with intent to defraud, coerce, or intimidate 6any individual for monetary gain is guilty of a Class I felony.SB815,3,77(3) Subsection (2) does not apply to any of the following:SB815,3,98(a) A provider or developer of any technology used in the creation of the 9synthetic digital representation.SB815,3,1410(b) A provider of an interactive computer service, as defined in 47 USC 230 (f) 11(2), or to an information service, as defined in 47 USC 153 (24), or 12telecommunications service, as defined in 47 USC 153 (53), if the synthetic digital 13representation is provided to the interactive computer service, information service, 14or telecommunications service by a 3rd party.SB815,3,1615(c) A person who publishes, distributes, or exhibits a synthetic digital 16representation that is newsworthy or of public importance.SB815,3,1917(d) A person who took action to notify viewers or listeners of the synthetic 18digital representation that the synthetic digital representation was not genuine in 19any of the following ways:SB815,3,22201. If the synthetic digital representation is in image format, it includes in 21writing that is readable, legible, and readily accessible the words “This content 22generated by AI.”SB815,4,2232. If the synthetic digital representation is in video format with or without 24audio, it includes throughout the duration of the synthetic digital representation, in 1writing that is readable, legible, and readily accessible, the words “This content 2generated by AI.”SB815,4,433. If the synthetic digital representation is in audio format, it includes both at 4the beginning and at the end the words “This content generated by AI.”SB815,4,55(e) A law enforcement officer engaged in their official duties.SB815,26Section 2. 946.82 (4) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Acts 24 7and 48, is amended to read:SB815,5,28946.82 (4) “Racketeering activity” means any activity specified in 18 USC 91961 (1) in effect as of April 27, 1982, or the attempt, conspiracy to commit, or 10commission of any of the felonies specified in: chs. 945 and 961, subch. V of ch. 551, 11and ss. 49.49, 134.05, 139.44 (1), (2m), and (8), 180.0129, 181.0129, 185.825, 201.09 12(2), 215.12, 221.0625, 221.0636, 221.0637, 221.1004, 553.41 (3) and (4), 553.52 (2), 13940.01, 940.21, 940.30, 940.302 (2), 940.305, 940.31, 940.60 (3), 940.61, 940.62, 14941.20 (2) and (3), 941.26, 941.28, 941.298, 941.31, 941.32, 942.085, 942.09, 15942.095, 943.01 (2), (2d), or (2g), 943.011, 943.012, 943.013, 943.02, 943.03, 943.04, 16943.05, 943.06, 943.10, 943.20 (3) (bf) to (e), 943.201, 943.203, 943.23 (2) and (3), 17943.231 (1), 943.24 (2), 943.27, 943.28, 943.30, 943.32, 943.34 (1) (bf), (bm), and (c), 18943.38, 943.39, 943.40, 943.41 (8) (b) and (c), 943.50 (4) (bf), (bm), and (c) and (4m), 19943.60, 943.70, 943.76, 943.81, 943.82, 943.825, 943.83, 943.84, 943.85, 943.86, 20943.87, 943.88, 943.89, 943.90, 944.21 (5) (c) and (e), 944.32, 944.34, 945.03 (1m), 21945.04 (1m), 945.05 (1), 945.08, 946.10, 946.11, 946.12, 946.13, 946.31, 946.32 (1), 22946.48, 946.49, 946.61, 946.64, 946.65, 946.72, 946.76, 946.79, 947.015, 947.016 (1) 23or (2), 948.05, 948.051, 948.08, 948.12, 948.125, and 948.30 and s. 940.19 (4), 2023 1stats., s. 940.19 (5), 2023 stats., s. 940.19 (6), 2023 stats., s. 940.20, 2023 stats., s. 2940.201, 2023 stats., and s. 940.203, 2023 stats.SB815,33Section 3. 995.50 (2) (am) 4. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 4Act 48, is amended to read:SB815,5,85995.50 (2) (am) 4. Conduct that is prohibited under s. 942.085, 942.09, or 6942.095, regardless of whether there has been a criminal action related to the 7conduct, and regardless of the outcome of the criminal action, if there has been a 8criminal action related to the conduct.SB815,5,99